Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB95.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Access to menstrual products is a matter of public health;
(2) Inadequate access contributes to school absenteeism, academic disparities, and
disproportionate impacts on students from low-income households;
(3) Provision of menstrual products in schools supports Kentucky’s obligations
under Title IX and promotes safe, healthy learning environments; and
(4) Menstrual products are essential health items necessary for the wellbeing,
dignity, and full participation of Kentucky students.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All public schools or public charter schools that include any of grades six (6)
through twelve (12) shall make at least one (1) type of menstrual product
available in:
(a) Each school building for use by students at no cost; and
(b) At least fifty percent (50%) of the combined total of the female, handicap,
unisex, or family bathrooms designated for student use in each school
building.
(2) Each local board of education or public charter school board of directors shall
adopt policies:
(a) Establishing procedures for the distribution of age-appropriate menstrual
products for use by students and related guidance regarding the safe and
healthy use of the products; and
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1307
(b) Prohibiting the resale, redistribution, or misuse of menstrual products
distributed to students in accordance with this section.
(3) Each local board of education and public charter school board of directors shall
adopt accountability measures to ensure consistent access to menstrual products,
including:
(a) Annual reporting to the department on the number and type of menstrual
products purchased, distributed, and remaining in inventory by June 15 of
each year;
(b) A restocking schedule ensuring that products in required bathrooms are
checked and replenished no less than once every two (2) weeks or as needed
based on usage; and
(c) A point-of-contact in each school building responsible for compliance.
(4) The department shall have the authority to issue supplemental guidance and
compliance reminders.
(5) All guidance and educational materials developed under subsection (4) of this
section shall:
(a) Be medically accurate, evidence-based, and consistent with current public
health research;
(b) Include information on safe use of tampons and menstrual cups, including
risks and symptoms of toxic shock syndrome;
(c) Be culturally competent and inclusive of students with diverse
developmental needs, gender identities, and language access needs; and
(d) Be made available to students and their families in print or electronic form.
(6) (a) Access to menstrual products as required under this section shall be
considered part of ensuring equal educational opportunity under federal
Title IX requirements.
(b) Local boards of education and public charter school boards of directors
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1307
shall ensure that students are not denied educational access, disciplined, or
otherwise penalized due to menstrual-related needs or lack of access to
menstrual products.
(c) The department shall issue guidance to support Title IX coordinators in
implementing menstrual-access protections and responding to related
complaints.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The department is authorized to negotiate contracts, purchase products on behalf
of local school districts, and require that products purchased under this program
meet minimum health, safety, and quality standards.
(2) The department shall distribute funding for menstrual products using a fairness-
weighted, tiered formula designed to reduce total statewide costs while prioritizing
districts with the highest levels of economic disadvantage. The formula shall
include the following three (3) tiers:
(a) Tier 1: Districts in which seventy percent (70%) or more of students qualify
for free or reduced-price lunch shall receive one hundred percent (100%)
reimbursement for product costs, and shall receive dispensers at no cost
through the state contract, and up to two cents ($0.02) per student for waste-
management needs;
(b) Tier 2: Districts in which fifty percent (50%) to sixty-nine percent (69%) of
students qualify for free or reduced-price lunch shall receive fifty percent
(50%) reimbursement for product costs, and shall receive dispensers at no
cost through the state contract; and
(c) Tier 3: Districts in which less than fifty percent (50%) of students qualify
for free or reduced-price lunch shall receive twenty-five percent (25%)
reimbursement for product costs and may opt in to the department’s
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1307
statewide purchasing contract to obtain reduced-price products.
(3) A district’s share of costs not reimbursed under this section may be paid from
existing school health funds, family resource and youth services centers
allocations, or local board funds.
(4) The department shall ensure that:
(a) Total annual program costs shall not exceed two million dollars
($2,000,000) through bulk purchasing and the use of need-based
reimbursements rather than automatic base grants;
(b) Funds are used solely for the purpose of meeting statutory compliance
under Section 2 of this Act; and
(c) No district receives more funding than necessary to meet the minimum
access standards established in Section 2 of this Act.
(5) The department shall submit an annual report by June 30 of each year to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on
Education detailing:
(a) District-level distributions made under each tier;
(b) Cost savings achieved through state procurement measures;
(c) Statewide and district-level expenditures relating to menstrual products;
and
(d) Any recommendations for improving cost efficiency, equity, or program
administration of the provision of menstrual products.
Section 4. KRS 158.007 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapter 158 unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Advanced placement" or "AP" means a college-level course that incorporates all
topics and instructional strategies specified by the College Board on its standard
syllabus for a given subject area and is licensed by the College Board;[.]
(2) "Advanced science and mathematics" means Advanced Placement or AP biology,
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1307
calculus, chemistry, computer science, environmental science, and physics, and
International Baccalaureate or IB biology, chemistry, computer science,
environmental systems, mathematical studies, further mathematics, and physics;[.]
(3) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Education;[.]
(4) "College Board Advanced Placement examination" means the advanced placement
test administered by the College Entrance Examination Board;[.]
(5) "College Board" means the College Entrance Examination Board, a national
nonprofit association that provides college admission guidance and advanced
placement examinations;[.]
(6) "Core curriculum" means at least one (1) course in science, one (1) course in
mathematics, and at least one (1) course in two (2) of the following subject areas:
English, social studies, foreign language, and the arts;[.]
(7) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education;[.]
(8) "Dual credit" means a college-level course of study developed in accordance with
KRS 164.098 in which a high school student receives credit from both the high
school and postsecondary institution in which the student is enrolled upon
completion of a single class or designated program of study;[.]
(9) "Dual enrollment" means a college-level course of study developed in accordance
with KRS 164.098 in which a student is enrolled in a high school and
postsecondary institution simultaneously;[.]
(10) "International Baccalaureate" or "IB" means the International Baccalaureate
Organization's Diploma Programme, a comprehensive two (2) year program
designed for highly motivated students;[.]
(11) "Kentucky Virtual High School" means secondary-level instructional programs or
courses offered by the Kentucky Department of Education through the Internet and
other on-line, computer-based methods;[.]
(12) "Kentucky Virtual University" means a college-level instructional program offered
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1307
by the Council on Postsecondary Education through the Internet or other on-line,
computer-based methods; and[.]
(13) "Menstrual product" means a tampon, panty liner, menstrual cup, pad, or any
other similar tangible personal property designed for use in connection with the
human menstrual cycle, but does not include any items of clothing or "grooming
and hygiene products" as defined in KRS 139.472.
Section 5. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$2,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium to the Learning and
Results Services budget unit within the Department of Education to provide menstrual
products for students, as set forth in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act.
Section 6. Whereas providing timely funding for the access and provision of
menstrual products in schools in the Commonwealth is important for the citizens of this
state, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 4:20 PM Jacketed